Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-6906
Performance of
abortion; consent not required; when.

Consent shall not be required
pursuant to sections 71-6901 to 71-6911 if any of the following
conditions exist:

(1) The attending physician certifies in the pregnant woman's medical
record that a medical emergency exists and there is insufficient time to obtain
the required consent; or

(2) Consent is waived under section 71-6903.

Laws 1991, LB 425, § 6;

Laws 2005, LB 116, § 23;

Laws 2011, LB690, § 10.